dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX CN Y 69
SFX CN ti l .
SFX CN ti la .
SFX CN ti lo .
SFX CN ti li .
SFX CN ti ų .
SFX CN gti žem .
SFX CN gti žeš .
SFX CN gti že .
SFX CN gti žemȯ .
SFX CN gti žete .
SFX CN ti ųt .
SFX CN gti žeh .
SFX CN gti žeše .
SFX CN gti žehmȯ .
SFX CN gti žeste .
SFX CN gti žehų .
SFX CN gti ži .
SFX CN gti žimȯ .
SFX CN gti žite .
SFX CN ti ųći .
SFX CN ti ųćego .
SFX CN ti ųćemu .
SFX CN ti ųćim .
SFX CN ti ųćem .
SFX CN ti ųćih .
SFX CN ti ųćimi .
SFX CN ti ųća .
SFX CN ti ųće .
SFX CN gti žemy .
SFX CN gti žemogo .
SFX CN gti žemomu .
SFX CN gti žemym .
SFX CN gti žemom .
SFX CN gti žemo .
SFX CN gti žema .
SFX CN gti žemų .
SFX CN gti žemoj .
SFX CN gti žemojų .
SFX CN gti žemi .
SFX CN gti žeme .
SFX CN gti žemyh .
SFX CN gti žemym .
SFX CN gti žemymi .
SFX CN gti žemo .
SFX CN ti ši .
SFX CN ti ša .
SFX CN ti še .
SFX CN gti ženy .
SFX CN gti ženogo .
SFX CN gti ženomu .
SFX CN gti ženym .
SFX CN gti ženom .
SFX CN gti ženi .
SFX CN gti žene .
SFX CN gti ženyh .
SFX CN gti ženymi .
SFX CN gti žena .
SFX CN gti ženų .
SFX CN gti ženoj .
SFX CN gti ženojų .
SFX CN gti ženo .
SFX CN gti žeńje/xPxE .
SFX CN gti žeńja/xPxE .
SFX CN gti žeńju/xPxE .
SFX CN gti žeńjem/xPxE .
SFX CN gti ženij/xPxE .
SFX CN gti žeńjam/xPxE .
SFX CN gti žeńjami/xPxE .
SFX CN gti žeńjah/xPxE .

SFX CO Y 7
SFX CO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CO 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX CO es ės/xPxE .
SFX CO es sa/xPxE .
SFX CO es su/xPxE .
SFX CO es som/xPxE .
SFX CO es se/xPxE .

SFX CP Y 12
SFX CP 0 e .
SFX CP 0 a .
SFX CP 0 ego .
SFX CP 0 ų .
SFX CP 0 ej .
SFX CP 0 em .
SFX CP 0 emu .
SFX CP 0 im .
SFX CP 0 ejų .
SFX CP 0 i .
SFX CP 0 ih .
SFX CP 0 imi .

SFX CQ Y 60
SFX CQ ti l .
SFX CQ ti la .
SFX CQ ti lo .
SFX CQ ti li .
SFX CQ lěti eljų .
SFX CQ lěti eljem .
SFX CQ lěti elješ .
SFX CQ lěti elje .
SFX CQ lěti eljemȯ .
SFX CQ lěti eljete .
SFX CQ lěti eljųt .
SFX CQ ti h .
SFX CQ ti še .
SFX CQ ti hmȯ .
SFX CQ ti ste .
SFX CQ ti hų .
SFX CQ lěti elj .
SFX CQ lěti eljmȯ .
SFX CQ lěti eljte .
SFX CQ lěti eljųći .
SFX CQ lěti eljųćego .
SFX CQ lěti eljųćemu .
SFX CQ lěti eljųćim .
SFX CQ lěti eljųćem .
SFX CQ lěti eljųćih .
SFX CQ lěti eljųćimi .
SFX CQ lěti eljųća .
SFX CQ lěti eljųće .
SFX CQ lěti eljemy .
SFX CQ lěti eljemogo .
SFX CQ lěti eljemomu .
SFX CQ lěti eljemym .
SFX CQ lěti eljemom .
SFX CQ lěti eljemo .
SFX CQ lěti eljema .
SFX CQ lěti eljemų .
SFX CQ lěti eljemoj .
SFX CQ lěti eljemojų .
SFX CQ lěti eljemi .
SFX CQ lěti eljeme .
SFX CQ lěti eljemyh .
SFX CQ lěti eljemym .
SFX CQ lěti eljemymi .
SFX CQ lěti eljemo .
SFX CQ ti vši .
SFX CQ ti všego .
SFX CQ ti všemu .
SFX CQ ti všim .
SFX CQ ti všem .
SFX CQ ti vših .
SFX CQ ti všimi .
SFX CQ ti vša .
SFX CQ ti všų .
SFX CQ ti všej .
SFX CQ ti všejų .
SFX CQ ti vše .
SFX CQ i y .
SFX CQ i a .
SFX CQ i o .
SFX CQ ti ťje .

SFX CR Y 11
SFX CR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CR a e/xPxBxO .
SFX CR a e/xPxE .
SFX CR a ų/xPxE .
SFX CR ja ej/xPxE .
SFX CR a i/xPxE .
SFX CR 0 h/xPxE .
SFX CR 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CR a ejų/xPxE .
SFX CR 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX CR a o/xPxE .

SFX CS Y 11
SFX CS 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CS a o/xPxBxO .
SFX CS a y/xPxE .
SFX CS a ų/xPxE .
SFX CS la ȯl/xPxE .
SFX CS a ě/xPxE .
SFX CS 0 h/xPxE .
SFX CS 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CS a ojų/xPxE .
SFX CS 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX CS a o/xPxE .

SFX CT Y 51
SFX CT reti ŕl .
SFX CT reti ŕla .
SFX CT reti ŕlo .
SFX CT reti ŕli .
SFX CT eti ų .
SFX CT ti m .
SFX CT ti š .
SFX CT ti 0 .
SFX CT ti mȯ .
SFX CT i e .
SFX CT eti ųt .
SFX CT ti h .
SFX CT ti še .
SFX CT ti hmȯ .
SFX CT ti ste .
SFX CT ti hų .
SFX CT eti i .
SFX CT eti imȯ .
SFX CT eti ite .
SFX CT eti ųći .
SFX CT eti ųćego .
SFX CT eti ųćemu .
SFX CT eti ųćim .
SFX CT eti ųćem .
SFX CT eti ųćih .
SFX CT eti ųćimi .
SFX CT eti ųća .
SFX CT eti ųće .
SFX CT ti my .
SFX CT ti mogo .
SFX CT ti momu .
SFX CT ti mym .
SFX CT ti mom .
SFX CT ti mo .
SFX CT ti ma .
SFX CT ti mų .
SFX CT ti moj .
SFX CT ti mojų .
SFX CT ti mi .
SFX CT ti me .
SFX CT ti myh .
SFX CT ti mym .
SFX CT ti mymi .
SFX CT ti mo .
SFX CT reti ŕši .
SFX CT reti ŕša .
SFX CT reti ŕše .
SFX CT reti ŕty .
SFX CT reti ŕta .
SFX CT reti ŕto .
SFX CT reti ŕťje .

SFX CU Y 2
SFX CU s m .
SFX CU s mi .

SFX CV Y 28
SFX CV 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CV y o/xBxPxE .
SFX CV y a/xPxE .
SFX CV y ogo/xPxE .
SFX CV y ų/xPxE .
SFX CV y oj/xPxE .
SFX CV y om/xPxE .
SFX CV y omu/xPxE .
SFX CV 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CV y ojų/xPxE .
SFX CV y i/xPxE .
SFX CV y e/xPxE .
SFX CV 0 h/xPxE .
SFX CV 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX CV ky čějši/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšego/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšemu/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšim/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšem/zz .
SFX CV ky čějše/zz .
SFX CV ky čějša/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšų/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšej/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšejų/zz .
SFX CV ky čějših/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšim/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšimi/zz .
SFX CV ky čeje/zz .

SFX CW Y 78
SFX CW ti l .
SFX CW ti la .
SFX CW ti lo .
SFX CW ti li .
SFX CW skati ščų .
SFX CW skati ščem .
SFX CW skati ščeš .
SFX CW skati šče .
SFX CW skati ščemȯ .
SFX CW skati ščete .
SFX CW skati ščųt .
SFX CW ti h .
SFX CW ti še .
SFX CW ti hmȯ .
SFX CW ti ste .
SFX CW ti hų .
SFX CW skati šči .
SFX CW skati ščimȯ .
SFX CW skati ščite .
SFX CW skati ščųći .
SFX CW skati ščųćego .
SFX CW skati ščųćemu .
SFX CW skati ščųćim .
SFX CW skati ščųćem .
SFX CW skati ščųćih .
SFX CW skati ščųćimi .
SFX CW skati ščųća .
SFX CW skati ščųće .
SFX CW skati ščemy .
SFX CW skati ščemogo .
SFX CW skati ščemomu .
SFX CW skati ščemym .
SFX CW skati ščemom .
SFX CW skati ščemo .
SFX CW skati ščema .
SFX CW skati ščemų .
SFX CW skati ščemoj .
SFX CW skati ščemojų .
SFX CW skati ščemi .
SFX CW skati ščeme .
SFX CW skati ščemyh .
SFX CW skati ščemym .
SFX CW skati ščemymi .
SFX CW skati ščemo .
SFX CW ti vši .
SFX CW ti všego .
SFX CW ti všemu .
SFX CW ti všim .
SFX CW ti všem .
SFX CW ti vših .
SFX CW ti všimi .
SFX CW ti vša .
SFX CW ti všų .
SFX CW ti všej .
SFX CW ti všejų .
SFX CW ti vše .
SFX CW ti ny .
SFX CW ti nogo .
SFX CW ti nomu .
SFX CW ti nym .
SFX CW ti nom .
SFX CW ti ni .
SFX CW ti ne .
SFX CW ti nyh .
SFX CW ti nymi .
SFX CW ti na .
SFX CW ti nų .
SFX CW ti noj .
SFX CW ti nojų .
SFX CW ti no .
SFX CW ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX CW ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX CW ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX CW ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX CW ti nij/xPxE .
SFX CW ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX CW ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX CW ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX CX Y 8
SFX CX a y .
SFX CX a ų .
SFX CX a 0 .
SFX CX a ě .
SFX CX 0 h .
SFX CX 0 m .
SFX CX a ojų .
SFX CX 0 mi .

SFX CY Y 78
SFX CY ti l .
SFX CY ti la .
SFX CY ti lo .
SFX CY ti li .
SFX CY ti ų .
SFX CY ti em .
SFX CY ti eš .
SFX CY ti e .
SFX CY ti emȯ .
SFX CY ti ete .
SFX CY ti ųt .
SFX CY ti h .
SFX CY ti še .
SFX CY ti hmȯ .
SFX CY ti ste .
SFX CY ti hų .
SFX CY ti i .
SFX CY ti imȯ .
SFX CY ti ite .
SFX CY ti ųći .
SFX CY ti ųćego .
SFX CY ti ųćemu .
SFX CY ti ųćim .
SFX CY ti ųćem .
SFX CY ti ųćih .
SFX CY ti ųćimi .
SFX CY ti ųća .
SFX CY ti ųće .
SFX CY ti emy .
SFX CY ti emogo .
SFX CY ti emomu .
SFX CY ti emym .
SFX CY ti emom .
SFX CY ti emo .
SFX CY ti ema .
SFX CY ti emų .
SFX CY ti emoj .
SFX CY ti emojų .
SFX CY ti emi .
SFX CY ti eme .
SFX CY ti emyh .
SFX CY ti emym .
SFX CY ti emymi .
SFX CY ti emo .
SFX CY ti vši .
SFX CY ti všego .
SFX CY ti všemu .
SFX CY ti všim .
SFX CY ti všem .
SFX CY ti vših .
SFX CY ti všimi .
SFX CY ti vša .
SFX CY ti všų .
SFX CY ti všej .
SFX CY ti všejų .
SFX CY ti vše .
SFX CY ti eny .
SFX CY ti enogo .
SFX CY ti enomu .
SFX CY ti enym .
SFX CY ti enom .
SFX CY ti eni .
SFX CY ti ene .
SFX CY ti enyh .
SFX CY ti enymi .
SFX CY ti ena .
SFX CY ti enų .
SFX CY ti enoj .
SFX CY ti enojų .
SFX CY ti eno .
SFX CY ti eńje/xPxE .
SFX CY ti eńja/xPxE .
SFX CY ti eńju/xPxE .
SFX CY ti eńjem/xPxE .
SFX CY ti enij/xPxE .
SFX CY ti eńjam/xPxE .
SFX CY ti eńjami/xPxE .
SFX CY ti eńjah/xPxE .

SFX CZ Y 12
SFX CZ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CZ 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX CZ et ėt/xPxE .
SFX CZ et ty/xPxE .
SFX CZ et ta/xPxE .
SFX CZ et tov/xPxE .
SFX CZ et tu/xPxE .
SFX CZ et tah/xPxE .
SFX CZ et tam/xPxE .
SFX CZ et tom/xPxE .
SFX CZ et tami/xPxE .
SFX CZ et te/xPxE .
