dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
mogti/CN
oves/CO
moj/CP
mlěti/CQ
kanja/CR
mgla/CS
umreti/CT
nas/CU
někaky/CV
ničij/CP
iskati/CW
nula/CX
odkryti/CY
ocet/CZ
svoj/CP
čij/CP
inočij/CP
svinja/CR
volja/CR
cibulja/CR
vaš/CP
pokryti/CY
kuhnja/CR
kapja/CR
naš/CP
studnja/CR
rolja/CR
pustynja/CR
pomogti/CN
tvoj/CP
zemja/CR
trgovja/CR
dynja/CR
pěsnja/CR
čerešnja/CR
čaplja/CR
večerja/CR
burja/CR
jednaky/CV
něčij/CP
sěmja/CR
taky/CV
nikaky/CV
kųpaljnja/CR
kulja/CR
kavarnja/CR
goręćnja/CR
kopaljnja/CR
treti/CT
hvilja/CR
ukryti/CY
lěčiljnja/CR
vśaky/CV
čitaljnja/CR
košulja/CR
strigti/CN
ostrigti/CN
mȯlnja/CR
spaljnja/CR
gospodynja/CR
iztreti/CT
smlěti/CQ
koj/CP
koj/CP
někoj/CP
izumreti/CT
sȯtnja/CR
cvekla/CS
čajiljnja/CR
četvŕtina/CX
desętina/CX
gostiljnja/CR
inaky/CV
knęgynja/CR
konopja/CR
lobanja/CR
mųčiljnja/CR
nedělja/CR
osmina/CX
ozemja/CR
pętina/CX
sedmnadsętina/CX
tretina/CX
založiljnja/CR
zemja/CR
diky/CV
najveliky/CV
osmnadsętina/CX
sědiljnja/CR
šestina/CX
sedmina/CX
devętina/CX
sȯtina/CX
stotina/CX
brȯnja/CR
kolikoraky/CV
iziskati/CW
ostrěgti/CN
poiskati/CW
povŕhnja/CR
skryti/CY
skrinja/CR
višnja/CR
zaključiljnja/CR
zorja/CR
ovaky/CV
onaky/CV
koliky/CV
seliky/CV
toliky/CV
ovoliky/CV
onoliky/CV
vseliky/CV
inoliky/CV
metla/CS
ovčarnja/CR
skryti/CY
ulja/CR
zakryti/CY
legti/CN
lęgti/CN
mnogoraky/CV
nalegti/CN
prěmogti/CN
råzlegti/CN
męsarnja/CR
pekarnja/CR
råzprja/CR
vpręgti/CN
zapręgti/CN
milja/CR
protreti/CT
strěgti/CN
strěgti/CN
nevolja/CR
kukla/CS
nakovaljnja/CR
fasolja/CR
čekaljnja/CR
nakryti/CY
banja/CR
bezrųky/CV
dropja/CR
hodulja/CR
igumenja/CR
iznemogti/CN
jednorųky/CV
jutrenja/CR
kovaljnja/CR
kupja/CR
kuznja/CR
laznja/CR
natreti/CT
neveliky/CV
obtreti/CT
odryti/CY
odstrigti/CN
odtreti/CT
råbynja/CR
råzkryti/CY
råzmlěti/CQ
råzmyti/CY
råzryti/CY
råztreti/CT
smogti/CN
vaflja/CR
vanilja/CR
vikunja/CR
zamreti/CT
knigarnja/CR
lěvorųky/CV
pravorųky/CV
desnorųky/CV
promyti/CY
flotilja/CR
izpręgti/CN
zavyti/CY
izmogti/CN
gargulja/CR
utreti/CT
vyryti/CY
obtreti/CT
pristrigti/CN
topolja/CR
milostynja/CR
monahynja/CR
ćelja/CR
poněkoj/CP
vsekaky/CV
iziskati/CW
pivovarnja/CR
ljutnja/CR
sablja/CR
plěvnja/CR
datulja/CR
faklja/CR
glåvnja/CR
suknja/CR
skotobojnja/CR
dupja/CR
izlęgti/CN
lęgti/CN
izlęgti/CN
marulja/CR
